Maine, session 132, LD1538.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §585, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 387, §2, is amended to
read:
1. Agricultural labor. "Agricultural labor" means agricultural labor as defined in the
Employment Security Law, chapter 13 Reemployment Assistance Program.
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §663, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 1975, c. 717, §5, is further
amended to read:
A. Any individual employed in agriculture as defined in the Maine Employment
Security Law Reemployment Assistance Program and the Federal Unemployment
Insurance Tax Law Act, except when that individual performs services for or on a farm
with over 300,000 laying birds;
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §1041 is amended to read:
§1041. Short title
This chapter shall be is known and may be cited as "the "Employment Security Law"
Reemployment Assistance Program."
Sec. 4. 26 MRSA §1043, sub-§16-A is enacted to read:
16-A. State average unemployment rate. "State average unemployment rate" means
a percentage equal to the average of the 3 months of the most recent 3rd quarter of a
calendar year of the seasonally adjusted unemployment rate for the State as published by
the Department of Labor.
Sec. 5. 26 MRSA §1164, as amended by PL 1999, c. 464, §5, is further amended to
read:
§1164. Special Administrative Expense Fund
The Special Administrative Expense Fund is created as a special fund in the State
Treasury. All interest, fines and penalties collected under this chapter and all voluntary
contributions tendered as a contribution to this fund must be paid into this fund. The money
may not be expended or available for expenditure in any manner that would permit its
substitution for, or a corresponding reduction in, federal funds that would in the absence of
that money be available to finance expenditures for the administration of the Employment
Security Law Reemployment Assistance Program. Nothing in this This section prevents
does not prevent the money from being used as a revolving fund to cover expenditures,
necessary and proper under the law, for which federal funds have been duly requested but
not yet received, subject to the charging of those expenditures against those funds when
received. The money in this fund must be used by the commissioner either for the payment
of costs of administration that are found not to have been properly and validly chargeable
against federal grants or other funds received for or in the Employment Security
Administration Fund on or after January 1, 1943, to finance the Maine Wage Assurance
Fund established in section 632; for the payment of costs of administering chapter 26, for
which federal funds are not available; or to fund activities that will improve the solvency
of the Unemployment Compensation Fund. The money must be available either to satisfy
the obligations incurred by the bureau directly or by requesting the Treasurer of State to
transfer the required amount from the Special Administrative Expense Fund to the
Page 1 - 132LR1638(01)

413 Employment Security Administration Fund or the Maine Wage Assurance Fund. The
424 Treasurer of State shall upon receipt of a written request of the commissioner make any
435 such transfer. The commissioner shall give notice to the commission prior to any
446 expenditures from this fund. The commissioner shall order the transfer of the funds or the
457 payment of any such obligation and the funds must be paid by the Treasurer of State on
468 requisitions drawn by the commissioner directing the State Controller to issue the State
479 Controller's warrant for them. The warrant must be drawn by the State Controller based
580 upon bills of particulars and vouchers certified by an officer or employee designated by the
591 commissioner. The money in this fund is specifically made available to replace, within a
1502 reasonable time, any money received by this State pursuant to section Section 302 of the
1513 Federal federal Social Security Act as amended that, because of any action or contingency,
1524 has been lost or has been expended for purposes other than, or in amounts in excess of,
1535 those necessary for the proper administration of the Employment Security Law
1546 Reemployment Assistance Program. The money in this fund must be continuously
1557 available to the commissioner for expenditure in accordance with this section and may not
1568 lapse at any time or be transferred to any other fund except as provided. Any money in the
1579 Special Administrative Expense Fund may be used to make refunds of interest, penalties
1680 or fines erroneously collected and deposited in the Special Administrative Expense Fund.
1691 On June 30th of each year all money in excess of $100,000 in this fund must be transferred
2602 to the Unemployment Compensation Fund.
Sec. 6. 26 MRSA §1191, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2009, c. 271, §2, is further
amended to read:
4. Maximum amount of benefits. The maximum amount of benefits that may be
paid to any eligible individual with respect to any benefit year, whether for total or partial
unemployment, may not exceed the lesser of 26 is 14 times the individual's weekly benefit
amount or 33 1/3%, rounded to the nearest dollar, of the individual's total wages paid for
insured work during the individual's base period, plus the supplemental weekly benefit for
dependents payable under subsection 6 if the state average unemployment rate is at or
below 5.5%, plus an additional amount equal to one week of the individual's weekly benefit
amount for each 0.5% of the state average unemployment rate above 5.5%, up to a
maximum of 26 times the individual's weekly benefit amount.
A. If a dislocated worker, as defined in section 1196, subsection 1, who is in training
approved under section 1192, subsection 6, 6-A, 6-C, 6-D or 6-E qualifies for
additional benefits under section 1043, subsection 5, paragraph B, or exhausts the
worker's entitlement to benefits available to the worker under this subsection, the
maximum amount under this subsection is the product of the worker's most recent
weekly benefit amount multiplied by the number of weeks in which the worker
thereafter attends an approved training program. No An increase may not be made
under this paragraph, with respect to any benefit period, greater than 26 times the
individual's weekly benefit amount.
(1) Benefits paid to an individual under this paragraph may not be charged against
the experience rating record of any employer, but must be charged to the General
Fund.
(2) No benefits Benefits may not be paid under this paragraph to any person:
Page 2 - 132LR1638(01)

(b) Until the person has exhausted benefits for which the person is eligible
under any unemployment insurance benefit program funded in whole or in part
by the State Government or Federal Government; or
(c) Who is eligible for or who has exhausted, after the effective date of this
paragraph, trade adjustment allowances as provided by the United States Trade
Act of 1974, Title II, Chapter 2, Public Law 93-617, United States Code, Title
19, Section 2291, et seq., and any amendments or additions thereto, or a similar
successor provision of that Act, except that any individual who was eligible
for and received less than 26 weeks of benefits under the United States Trade
Act may receive benefits for the number of weeks by which their benefits under
that Act are less than 26 weeks.
Sec. 7. 26 MRSA §1221, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 585, §1, is further
amended to read:
A. At the time the status of an employing unit is ascertained to be that of an employer,
the commissioner shall establish and maintain, until the employer status is terminated,
for the employer an experience rating record, to which are credited all the contributions
that the employer pays on the employer's own behalf. This chapter may not be
construed to grant any employer or individuals in the employer's service prior claims
or rights to the amounts paid by the employer into the fund. Benefits paid to an eligible
individual under the Employment Security Law Reemployment Assistance Program
must be charged against the experience rating record of the claimant's most recent
subject employer or to the General Fund if the otherwise chargeable experience rating
record is that of an employer whose status as such has been terminated; except that no
charge may be made to an individual employer but must be made to the General Fund
if the commission finds that:
(1) The claimant's separation from the claimant's last employer was for misconduct
in connection with the claimant's employment or was voluntary without good cause
attributable to the employer;
(2) The claimant has refused to accept reemployment in suitable work when
offered by a previous employer, without good cause attributable to the employer;
(3) Benefits paid are not chargeable against any employer's experience rating
record in accordance with section 1194, subsection 11, paragraphs B and C;
(5) Reimbursements are made to a state, the Virgin Islands or Canada for benefits
paid to a claimant under a reciprocal benefits arrangement as authorized in section
1082, subsection 12, as long as the wages of the claimant transferred to the other
state, the Virgin Islands or Canada under such an arrangement are less than the
amount of wages for insured work required for benefit purposes by section 1192,
subsection 5;
(6) The claimant was hired by the claimant's last employer to fill a position left
open by a Legislator given a leave of absence under chapter 7, subchapter 5‑A, and
the claimant's separation from this employer was because the employer restored
the Legislator to the position after the Legislator's leave of absence as required by
chapter 7, subchapter 5‑A;
Page 3 - 132LR1638(01)

(7) The claimant was hired by the claimant's last employer to fill a position left
open by an individual who left to enter active duty in the United States military,
and the claimant's separation from this employer was because the employer
restored the military serviceperson to the person's former employment upon
separation from military service;
(8) The claimant was hired by the claimant's last employer to fill a position left
open by an individual given a leave of absence for family medical leave provided
under Maine or federal law, and the claimant's separation from this employer was
because the employer restored the individual to the position at the completion of
the leave; or
(9) The claimant initiated a partial separation or reduction of hours and that partial
separation or reduction of hours was agreed to by the employee and employer.
Sec. 8. 26 MRSA §1221-B, sub-§5, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 381, §1, is
amended to read:
C. Could cause services in the employ of the Indian tribe to be excepted from
employment for purposes of obtaining benefits under the Employment Security Law
Reemployment Assistance Program.
Sec. 9. 36 MRSA §5219-XX, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 181, Pt. A, §13,
is further amended to read:
2. Credit allowed. A taxpayer engaged in the production of renewable chemicals in
the State who has complied with subsection 5 and the rules adopted under that subsection
is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this Part on income derived during the taxable
year from the production of renewable chemicals in the amount of 8¢ per pound of
renewable chemical produced in the State as long as the taxpayer demonstrates to the
Department of Economic and Community Development that at least 75% of the employees
of the contractors hired or retained to harvest renewable biomass used in the production of
the renewable chemicals meet the eligibility conditions specified in the Employment
Security Law Reemployment Assistance Program.
If the taxpayer does not contract directly with those hired or retained to harvest the
renewable biomass, the taxpayer may obtain the necessary documentation under this
subsection from the landowner or other entity that contracts directly.
Sec. 10. 39-A MRSA §220, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1991, c. 885, Pt. A, §8 and
affected by §§9 to 11, is amended to read:
1. Reduction for unemployment benefits. Compensation paid under this Act, except
compensation under section 212, subsection 3 and lump sum settlements, to any employee
for any period for which the employee is receiving or has received benefits under the
Employment Security Law Reemployment Assistance Program, Title 26, chapter 13, must
be reduced by the amount of the unemployment benefits.